Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska20-324
Equal Opportunity Commission; educational and conciliatory activities; programs of compliance and enforcement.

The commission shall conduct such educational and conciliatory activities as in the commission's judgment will further the purposes of the Nebraska Fair Housing Act. The commission shall call conferences of persons in the housing industry and other interested persons to acquaint them with the act and suggested means of implementing it and shall endeavor with their advice to work out programs of voluntary compliance and of enforcement. The commission shall consult with local officials and other interested parties to learn the extent, if any, to which housing discrimination exists in their locality and whether and how local enforcement programs might be utilized to combat such discrimination in connection with or in place of the commission's enforcement of the act. The commission shall issue reports on such conferences and consultations as it deems appropriate.

Laws 1969, c. 120, § 8, p. 543;

R.S.1943, (1987), § 20-112;

Laws 1991, LB 825, § 25.